Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.010

Purpose—Powers of county legislative authority as to tax title lands.

The purpose of this chapter is to increase the power of county legislative authorities over tax title lands. The legislative authority of each county shall have the power to devote tax title lands to public use under its own control or the control of other governmental or quasi-governmental agencies, to exchange such lands for lands worth at least ninety percent of the value of the land exchanged, and to manage such lands to produce maximum revenue therefrom in the manner which derives the most income from such lands. The further purpose of this chapter is to relieve the courts of the obligation of supervising the county legislative authorities in the management and disposition of tax title lands.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 150 s 1.]